Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.050

Export assistance services contract with department of commerce.

(1) The small business export finance assistance center formed under RCW 43.210.020 and 43.210.030 must enter into a contract under this chapter with the department of commerce or its statutory successor.

(2) The contract under subsection (1) of this section must:

(a) Require the center to provide export assistance services;

(b) Have a duration of two years;

(c) Require the center to aggressively seek to fund its continued operation from nonstate funds; and

(d) Require the center to report annually to the department on its success in obtaining nonstate funding.

[ 2010 c 166 s 2; 1998 c 245 s 84; 1995 c 399 s 107; 1991 c 314 s 16. Prior: 1985 c 466 s 64; 1985 c 231 s 5; 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—1991 c 314: See note following RCW 43.160.020.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.